Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 7. Sale of Property by Administrator

38-13-701.
Public sale of property.

Subject to section 38-13-702, not earlier than three years after receipt of property that is presumed abandoned, the administrator may sell the property.

Before selling property under subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall give notice to the public of:

The date of sale; and

A reasonable description of the property.

A sale under subsection (1) of this section must be to the highest bidder:

At public sale at a location in this state that the administrator determines to be the most favorable market for the property; or

On the internet; or

On another forum the administrator determines is likely to yield the highest net proceeds of sale.

The administrator may decline the highest bid at a sale under subsection (1) of this section and reoffer the property for sale if the administrator determines the highest bid is insufficient.

If a sale held under this section is to be conducted other than on the internet, the administrator must publish at least one notice of the sale at least three weeks but not more than five weeks before the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is sold.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 435, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-702.
Disposal of securities.

The administrator shall not sell or otherwise liquidate a security until three years after the administrator receives the security and gives the apparent owner notice under section 38-13-503 that the administrator holds the security. This subsection (1) applies to any security presumed abandoned under section 38-13-208 with a commencement date, reported under section 38-13-402, that is on or after July 1, 2014.

The administrator shall not sell a security listed on an established stock exchange for less than the price prevailing on the exchange at the time of sale. The administrator may sell a security not listed on an established exchange by any commercially reasonable method.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 436, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-703.
Recovery of securities or value by owner.

A person that makes a valid claim under this article 13 of ownership of a security is entitled to receive:

The security the holder delivered to the administrator, if it is in the custody of the administrator, plus dividends, interest, and other increments on the security up to the time the administrator delivers the security to the person; or

The net proceeds of the sale of the security, plus dividends, interest, and other increments on the security up to the time the security was sold.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 436, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-704.
Purchaser owns property after sale.

A purchaser of property at a sale conducted by the administrator under this article 13 takes the property free of all claims of the owner, a previous holder, or a person claiming through the owner or holder. The administrator shall execute documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership to the purchaser.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 436, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-705.
Military medal or decoration.

The administrator shall not sell a medal or decoration awarded for military service in the armed forces of the United States.

The administrator, with the consent of the respective organization under subsection (2)(a) of this section, agency under subsection (2)(c) of this section, or entity under subsection (2)(d) of this section, may deliver a medal or decoration described in subsection (1) of this section to be held in custody for the owner, to:

A military veterans’ organization qualified under section 501 (c)(19) of the federal “Internal Revenue Code of 1986”, as amended, 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c)(19);

The Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake;

The agency that awarded the medal or decoration; or

A governmental entity.

On delivery under subsection (2) of this section, the administrator is not responsible for safekeeping of the medal or decoration.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 436, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.